Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-2903
Presumption; act; how construed.

(1) An individual performing construction labor services for a contractor is presumed an employee and not an independent contractor for purposes of the Employee Classification Act, unless:

(a) The individual meets the criteria found in subdivision (5) of section 48-604;

(b) The individual has been registered as a contractor pursuant to the Contractor Registration Act prior to commencing construction work for the contractor; and

(c) The individual has been assigned a combined tax rate pursuant to sections 48-649 to 48-649.04 or is exempted from unemployment insurance coverage pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 48-604.

(2) An individual performing delivery services for a contractor is presumed an employee and not an independent contractor for purposes of the Employee Classification Act, unless the individual meets the criteria found in subdivision (5) of section 48-604 or is exempted from unemployment insurance coverage pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 48-604.

(3) The Employee Classification Act shall not be construed to affect or apply to a common-law or statutory action providing for recovery in tort and shall not be construed to affect or change the common-law interpretation of independent contractor status as it relates to tort liability or a workers' compensation claim. The act shall also not be construed to affect or alter the use of the term independent contractor as interpreted by the Department of Revenue and shall not be construed to affect any action brought pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 2010, LB563, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 84.

Contractor Registration Act, see section 48-2101.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.